Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.077] INFORMED CONSENT REQUIRED FOR MEDICAL TREATMENT PROVIDED TO AN UNCONSCIOUS PATIENT BY STUDENT OR MEDICAL RESIDENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Medical resident" means a physician who has graduated from medical school and is undergoing supervised clinical training in a specific medical specialty. new text end new text begin (c) "Student" means an individual enrolled in a health-related occupation education program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Informed consent required; exceptions. new text end new text begin (a) A student or medical resident may perform medical treatment on an unconscious patient if the patient or the patient's legally authorized representative provides prior written informed consent to medical treatment to be provided by a student or medical resident, and the medical treatment is necessary for preventative, diagnostic, or treatment purposes. new text end new text begin (b) Written informed consent must include, at a minimum, a description of the specific medical treatment to be performed and notice that the medical treatment may be performed by a student or a medical resident. An informed consent disclosure form must be approved by the commissioner prior to its use. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalty; grounds for disciplinary action. new text end new text begin A student who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the education program provider or academic institution the student attends. A medical resident who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the health-related licensing board regulating the medical resident. new text end